Hawaii statutes.
TITLE 36.
CIVIL REMEDIES AND DEFENSES

AND
SPECIAL PROCEEDINGS

Chapter

651 Attachment and Execution

651C Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act

652 Garnishment

653 Garnishment of Government Beneficiaries

654 Special Proceedings for Immediate Possession
of

Personal Property

655 Deposit and Delivery

656 Frauds, Statute of

657 Limitation of Actions

657D Civil Relief for State Military Forces

658 Arbitration and Awards--Repealed

658A Uniform Arbitration Act

658B Uniform Foreign-Money Claims Act

658C Uniform Foreign Money-Judgments Recognition

Act--Repealed

658D International Arbitration

658F Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments
Recognition Act

658G Hawaii Uniform Collaborative Law Act

658H Uniform Mediation Act

659 Quo Warranto

660 Habeas Corpus

661 Actions By and Against the State

662 State Tort Liability Act

662D Volunteer Service; Immunity

662E Claims Against Government Arising Out of Year
2000

Errors--Repealed

663 Tort Actions

663A Civil Liability for Shoplifting

663B Equine Activities

663D Drug Dealer Liability--Repealed

663E Drug Dealer Liability

663J Liability for Coercion into Prostitution

663M Year 2000 Errors in Computer-Based
Systems--Repealed

664 Boundaries, Fences, Ways, Water Rights

665 Escheat

666 Landlord and Tenant

667 Foreclosures

668 Partition of Real Estate

669 Quieting Title

671 Medical Torts

671D Health Care Peer Review

672 Design Professional Conciliation
Panel--Repealed

672B Design Claim Conciliation Panel

672E Contractor Repair Act

673 Native Hawaiian Trusts Judicial Relief Act

674 Individual Claims Resolution Under the
Hawaiian

Home Lands Trust

675 Tobacco Liability Act

676 Structured Settlement Protection Act

Note

As to procedural statutes superseded by the rules of court,
see note preceding Title 32.

CHAPTER
651

ATTACHMENT
AND EXECUTION

Part I. Attachment

Section

651-1 General provisions

651-2 Writ; issued when

651-3 Affidavit

651-4 Bond; amount and conditions

651-5 Additional security

651-6 Action on bond

651-7 Writ; how issued

651-8 Amount levied on

651-9 Writ; how executed

651-10 Indemnity for police officer

651-11 Execution in order of receipt

651-12 Examination of defendant; where no
property known

651-13 Attached property; sale of

651-14 Appointment of receiver

651-15 Officer's return; how made

651-16 Discharge of writ

651-17 Discharge by bond of defendant

651-18 Discharge of writ when improperly issued

651-19 Recording discharge

651-20 Judgment satisfied out of attached
property

651-21 Deficiency

Part II. Execution

651-31 Time of issuance

651-32 Execution, district court; form

651-32.1 Repealed

651-33 Bond for expenses on execution

651-34 Time within which execution shall be
returnable

651-35 When property in circuit insufficient

651-36 Execution, courts of record; form

651-37 Address, signature

651-38 Alias writs

651-39 Available in all circuits

651-40 Stay by judge; effect

651-41 Priority in levying

651-42 How levy made, inventory

651-43 Advertisement for sale

651-44 Sale; proceeds; return

651-45 Postponement of sale

651-46 Deeds, etc.

651-47 Levy on and execution sale of investment
securities;

garnishment the proper procedure when the
security is

subject to right of possession of third
party

651-48 Same, penalty

651-49 Only defendant's interest sold

651-50 Liability for exceeding powers

651-51 Indemnity bond

651-52 Indemnity, how collected

Part III. Exemptions

A. Generally

651-61 Exemption, how claimed

651-62 Indemnity bond if exemption claimed

651-63 Liability for selling exempt property

651-64 Seizure of exempt property

651-65 to 67 Repealed

651-68 Proceedings on execution; appraisers;
expiration of

lien, result

651-69 Application form contents

651-70 Service of petition and notice of hearing;
effects of

failure to serve; appointment of
appraisers

B. Real Property

651-91 Definitions

651-92 Real property exempt

651-93 Effect of separation, divorce,
reconciliation

651-94 Proceedings where real property can be
divided without

material injury

651-95 Sale where real property cannot be
divided;

application of proceeds

651-96 After sale, money equal to real property
exemption

protected

C. Personal Property

651-121 Certain personal property and insurance
thereon,

exempt

651-122 Personal property not exempt

651-123 Application of proceeds of sale

651-124 Pension money exempt

Note

As to procedural statutes superseded by the rules of court,
see note preceding Title 32.

Case Notes

Validity of prejudgment replevin provisions authorizing
taking of property without affording prior opportunity to be heard. 407 U.S.
67.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next